Wisconsin, session 2025, SB908.
do enact as follows:Law Revision Committee prefatory note: This bill is a remedial legislation proposal, requested by the Department of Employee Trust Funds and introduced by the Law Revision Committee under s. 13.83 (1) (c) 4. and 5., stats. After careful consideration of the various provisions of the bill, the Law Revision Committee has determined that this bill makes minor substantive changes in the statutes, and that these changes are desirable as a matter of public policy.SB908,11Section 1. 40.02 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB908,2,4240.02 (2) “Additional contribution” means any contribution made by or on 3behalf of a participant participating employee to the retirement system other than 4employee and employer required contributions.SB908,25Section 2. 40.02 (25) (a) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB908,2,11640.02 (25) (a) 4. Only a person who has not attained age 70 at the time of 7becoming initially eligible for the group insurance coverage provided under this 8chapter; but this subdivision does not exclude any participant from participation in 9the group health insurance plan or income continuation insurance plan nor does it 10exclude from participation in the group life insurance plan any employee who is 11initially eligible on the employer’s effective date of participation.Note: This Section clarifies that certain persons who are eligible to participate in a group health insurance plan provided by the Group Insurance Board are also eligible to participate in an income continuation insurance plan.SB908,31Section 3. 40.04 (8) of the statutes is repealed.Note: This Section deletes a provision, now obsolete under federal law, that requires the state to maintain a social security account within the public employee trust fund for the purpose of crediting certain employee and employer contributions. SB908,42Section 4. 40.05 (1) (a) 5. of the statutes is amended to read:SB908,3,8340.05 (1) (a) 5. Additional contributions may be made by any participant 4participating employee by deduction from earnings or otherwise or may be provided 5on behalf of any participant participating employee in any calendar year in which 6the participant participating employee has earnings, subject to any limitations 7imposed on contributions by the Internal Revenue Code, applicable regulations 8adopted under the Internal Revenue Code and rules of the department.Note: Sections 1 and 4 replace the word “participant” with the phrase “participating employee” for purposes of determining who is eligible to make additional contributions to retirement accounts under the Wisconsin Retirement System.SB908,59Section 5. 40.05 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB908,3,171040.05 (3) Social security contributions. Each employer included under an 11agreement made under subch. III shall make the contributions required under 12federal regulations and shall also withhold from the wages of each of its employees 13who are covered by the state-federal agreement provided for by subch. III the 14amount required to be withheld under federal regulations. The state shall be liable 15for all remittances due from employers in conformity with agreements under subch. 16III and shall make payment of all sums which are due under this subsection and 17become delinquent.Note: This Section deletes a provision, now obsolete under federal law, that imposes liability on the state when an individual employer participating in the Wisconsin Retirement System is delinquent in making a FICA (Federal Insurance Contributions Act) contribution. SB908,3,1818